test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nai_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - nai: # Noun 191 'eng /est naine /fin' - full paradigm
     nai+N+Sg+Nom: nai
     nai+N+Sg+Gen: naiz
     nai+N+Sg+Par: nāizta
     nai+N+Sg+Dat: naizõn
     nai+N+Sg+Ins: naizõks
     nai+N+Sg+Ill: naizõ
     nai+N+Sg+Ela: [naizõst, naistõ]
     nai+N+Pl+Nom: naizt
     nai+N+Pl+Gen: naizt
     nai+N+Pl+Par: naiži
     nai+N+Pl+Dat: naiztõn
     nai+N+Pl+Ins: naiztkõks
     nai+N+Pl+Ill: naižiz
     nai+N+Pl+Ela: naižist
